Maryland, session 2026, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1259*

HOUSE BILL 1259
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(18) § 4–216 ([Limitations –] Family child care homes and large family child
care homes);
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
4–216.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Family child care home” has the meaning stated in § 9.5–301 of the
Education Article.
(3) “Large family child care home” has the meaning stated in § 9.5–301 of
the Education Article.
(b) A local jurisdiction, BY LOCAL ORDINANCE, RESOLUTION, LAW, OR RULE:
(1) may not[, by local ordinance, resolution, law, or rule,]:
(I) limit the number of children for which a family child care home
or large family child care home provides family child care to below the number authorized
by the State Department of Education; OR
(II) DENY OR RESTRICT THE OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME THAT MEETS THE LICENSING
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION; AND
(2) SHALL DESIGNATE THE OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME AS:
(I) A RESIDENTIAL ACTIVITY; AND
(II) A PERMITTED USE UNDER RESIDENTIAL ZONING
REQUIREMENTS.
10–103.

HOUSE BILL 1259 3
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(17) § 4–216 ([Limitations –] Family child care homes and large family child
care homes);
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.